3rdParty/snowball/algorithms/dutch/stem_ISO_8859_1.sbl
routines (
           prelude postlude
           e_ending
           en_ending
           mark_regions
           R1 R2
           undouble
           standard_suffix
)

externals ( stem )

booleans ( e_found )

integers ( p1 p2 )

groupings ( v v_I v_j )

stringescapes {}

/* special characters (in ISO Latin I) */

stringdef a"   hex 'E4'
stringdef e"   hex 'EB'
stringdef i"   hex 'EF'
stringdef o"   hex 'F6'
stringdef u"   hex 'FC'

stringdef a'   hex 'E1'
stringdef e'   hex 'E9'
stringdef i'   hex 'ED'
stringdef o'   hex 'F3'
stringdef u'   hex 'FA'

stringdef e`   hex 'E8'

define v       'aeiouy{e`}'
define v_I     v + 'I'
define v_j     v + 'j'

define prelude as (
    test repeat (
        [substring] among(
            '{a"}' '{a'}'
                (<- 'a')
            '{e"}' '{e'}'
                (<- 'e')
            '{i"}' '{i'}'
                (<- 'i')
            '{o"}' '{o'}'
                (<- 'o')
            '{u"}' '{u'}'
                (<- 'u')
            ''  (next)
        ) //or next
    )
    try(['y'] <- 'Y')
    repeat goto (
        v [('i'] v <- 'I') or
           ('y']   <- 'Y')
    )
)

define mark_regions as (

    $p1 = limit
    $p2 = limit

    gopast v  gopast non-v  setmark p1
    try($p1 < 3  $p1 = 3)  // at least 3
    gopast v  gopast non-v  setmark p2

)

define postlude as repeat (

    [substring] among(
        'Y'  (<- 'y')
        'I'  (<- 'i')
        ''   (next)
    ) //or next

)

backwardmode (

    define R1 as $p1 <= cursor
    define R2 as $p2 <= cursor

    define undouble as (
        test among('kk' 'dd' 'tt') [next] delete
    )

    define e_ending as (
        unset e_found
        ['e'] R1 test non-v delete
        set e_found
        undouble
    )

    define en_ending as (
        R1 non-v and not 'gem' delete
        undouble
    )

    define standard_suffix as (
        do (
            [substring] among(
                'heden'
                (   R1 <- 'heid'
                )
                'en' 'ene'
                (   en_ending
                )
                's' 'se'
                (   R1 non-v_j delete
                )
            )
        )
        do e_ending

        do ( ['heid'] R2 not 'c' delete
             ['en'] en_ending
           )

        do (
            [substring] among(
                'end' 'ing'
                (   R2 delete
                    (['ig'] R2 not 'e' delete) or undouble
                )
                'ig'
                (   R2 not 'e' delete
                )
                'lijk'
                (   R2 delete e_ending
                )
                'baar'
                (   R2 delete
                )
                'bar'
                (   R2 e_found delete
                )
            )
        )
        do (
            non-v_I
            test (
                among ('aa' 'ee' 'oo' 'uu')
                non-v
            )
            [next] delete
        )
    )
)

define stem as (

        do prelude
        do mark_regions
        backwards
            do standard_suffix
        do postlude
)
